02_Morphology/chv.lexc
!Multichar_Symbols

!%<n%>		! Noun

!LEXICON Root

!урам%<n%>:урам # ; ! "улица", "street" 
!пахча%<n%>:пахча # ; ! "сац", "garden"
!хула%<n%>:хула # ; ! "город", "city"
!канаш%<n%>:канаш # ; ! "совет", "council"


Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное, Noun
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число, Plural

%>                   ! Граница морфемы, Morpheme boundary
%{A%}		     ! placeholder/archiphoneme [a] or [e] in Chuvash
%{Ă%}	     ! genetive morpheme placeholder for singular and plural
%{м%}	     ! plural morpheme 
%{ъ%}		     ! forces back vowel harmony

%<v%>                ! Глагол, Verb
%<tv%>               ! Переходный, Transitive
%<aor%>              ! Аорист, Aorist
%<m%>                ! Мужский род, Masculine
%<f%>                ! Женский род, Feminine
%<nt%>               ! Средный род, Neuter
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число, Plural
%<der_лӑх%>	     ! Derivational suffix
%<guess%>


@P.Gender.Msc@       ! Согласование мужского рода, Masculine agreement
@P.Gender.Fem@       ! Согласование женского рода, Feminine agreement
@P.Gender.Neu@       ! Согласование средного рода, Neuter agreement
@P.Gender.Plu@       ! Согласование множественного падежа, Plural agreement

@R.Gender.Msc@       ! Согласование мужского рода
@R.Gender.Fem@       ! Согласование женского рода
@R.Gender.Neu@       ! Согласование средного рода
@R.Gender.Plu@       ! Согласование множественного падежа

LEXICON Root

Nouns ; 

Prefixes ;

Guesser ;


LEXICON Guesser

🂡%<guess%>:🂡 N ;


LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица", "street"
пахча:пахча N ;   ! "сад", "garden"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город", "city"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет", "council"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид", "aspect"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь", "tsar"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз", "eye"
патшалӑх:патшалӑх N ;	! "государство", "state"
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист"

LEXICON Prefixes

@P.Gender.Msc@:@P.Gender.Msc@в Verbs ;
@P.Gender.Fem@:@P.Gender.Fem@й Verbs ;
@P.Gender.Neu@:@P.Gender.Neu@б Verbs ;
@P.Gender.Plu@:@P.Gender.Plu@р Verbs ;

LEXICON AGR

@R.Gender.Msc@%<m%>:@R.Gender.Msc@ # ;
@R.Gender.Fem@%<f%>:@R.Gender.Fem@ # ;
@R.Gender.Neu@%<nt%>:@R.Gender.Neu@ # ;
@R.Gender.Plu@%<pl%>:@R.Gender.Plu@ # ;

LEXICON V-TV

%<v%>%<tv%>%<aor%>:%>уна AGR ;

LEXICON Verbs

бицине:иц V-TV ; ! "говорить", "say"

LEXICON CASES
%<nom%>: #;
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ; 
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н # ; 	! genetive morpheme after both singular and plural

LEXICON PLURAL
		CASES; 
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%}   CASES;

LEXICON SUBST 

PLURAL ;

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST ;
%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL; 
%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;


LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>:%- CASES ;

LEXICON LAST-DIGIT

1:1%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "пӗр" 
2:2%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "иккӗ" 
3:3%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "виҫҫӗ" 
4:4%{с%}%{а%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тӑваттӑ" 
5:5%{э%}%{с%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "пиллӗк" 
6:6%{с%}%{а%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "улттӑ" 
7:7%{с%}%{э%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "ҫиччӗ" 
8:8%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "саккӑр" 
9:9%{э%}%{л%}    NUM-DIGIT ; ! "тӑххӑр" 

LEXICON LOOP

                 LAST-DIGIT ; 
                 DIGITLEX ; 

LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;
